District of Columbia statutes.
28-3603

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, “finance charge” and “annual percentage rate” shall have the respective meanings under the provisions of the Truth-in-Lending Act (82 Stat. 146 et seq.; 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.) and the regulations and interpretations thereunder; and “federally insured bank or savings and loan association” means an insured bank as defined in section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act or an “insured institution” as defined in section 401 of the National Housing Act.

History

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 667, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3603.
1973 Ed., § 28-3603.

References in Text

Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act and section 401 of the National Housing Act, both referred to in this section, are codified in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1813 and 1724, respectively. 12 U.S.C. § 1724 was repealed by Pub. L. 101-73, title IV, § 407, August 9, 1989, 103 Stat. 363.